Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 2

Residential Property Disclosures

66-5-201. General provisions.

This part applies only with respect to transfers by sale, exchange, installment land sales contract or lease with option to buy residential real property consisting of not less than one (1) nor more than four (4) dwelling units, including site-built and nonsite-built homes, whether or not the transaction is consummated with the assistance of a licensed real estate broker or salesperson. The disclosure statement referenced in §66-5-202 is not a warranty of any kind by a seller and is not a substitute for inspections either by the individual purchasers or by a professional home inspector. The disclosure required by this part shall be provided to potential buyers for their exclusive use and may not be relied upon by purchasers in subsequent transfers from the original purchaser who received the property disclosure. The required disclosure shall be given in good faith by the owner or owners of property that is being transferred and shall be subject to the requirements of this part.

Acts 1994, ch. 828, § 1; 2000, ch. 771, § 1.

66-5-202. Required disclosures or disclaimers.

With regard to transfers described in §66-5-201, the owner of the residential property shall furnish to a purchaser one of the following:

A residential property disclosure statement in the form provided in this part regarding the condition of the property, including any material defects known to the owner. Such disclosure form may be as included in this part and must include all items listed on the disclosure form required pursuant to this part. The disclosure form shall contain a notice to prospective purchasers and owners that the prospective purchaser and the owner may wish to obtain professional advice or inspections of the property. The disclosure form shall also contain a notice to purchasers that the information contained in the disclosure are the representations of the owner and are not the representations of the real estate licensee or sales person, if any. The owner shall not be required to undertake or provide any independent investigation or inspection of the property in order to make the disclosures required by this part; or

A residential property disclaimer statement stating that the owner makes no representations or warranties as to the condition of the real property or any improvements thereon and that purchaser will be receiving the real property “as is,” that is, with all defects which may exist, if any, except as otherwise provided in the real estate purchase contract. A disclaimer statement may only be permitted where the purchaser waives the required disclosure under subdivision (1). If the purchaser does not waive the required disclosure under this part, the disclosure statement described in subdivision (1) shall be provided in accordance with the requirements of this part.

Acts 1994, ch. 828, § 2.

66-5-203. Delivery of disclosure or disclaimer statement.

The owner of residential real property subject to this part shall deliver to the purchaser the written disclosure or disclaimer statement, if agreed upon by the purchaser required by this part prior to the acceptance of a real estate purchase contract. For purposes of this part, a “real estate purchase contract” means a contract for the sale, exchange or lease with option to buy of real estate subject to this part, and “acceptance” means the full execution of a real estate purchase contract by all parties. The residential property disclaimer statement or residential property disclosure statement may be included in the real estate purchase contract, in an addendum to the contract, or in a separate document.

Failure to provide the disclosure or disclaimer statement required by this part shall not permit a purchaser to terminate a real estate purchase contract; however, a purchaser shall not be restricted by this part from bringing such other actions at law or in equity that are otherwise permitted.

Acts 1994, ch. 828, § 3.

66-5-204. Liability for errors or omissions — Experts' reports.

The owner shall not be liable for any error, inaccuracy or omission of any information delivered pursuant to this part if:

The error, inaccuracy or omission was not within the actual knowledge of the owner or was based upon information provided by public agencies or by other persons providing information as specified in subsection (b) that is required to be disclosed pursuant to this part, or the owner reasonably believed the information to be correct; and

The owner was not grossly negligent in obtaining the information from a third party and transmitting it.

The delivery by a public agency or other person, as described in subsection (c), of any information required to be disclosed by this part to a prospective purchaser shall be deemed to comply with the requirements of this part, and shall relieve the owner of any further duty under this part with respect to that item of information.

The delivery by the owner of a report or opinion prepared by a licensed engineer, land surveyor, geologist, wood destroying insect control expert, contract or other home inspection expert, dealing with matters within the scope of the professional license or expertise, shall satisfy the requirements of subsection (a) if the information is provided to the owner pursuant to request therefor, whether written or oral. In responding to such a request, an expert may indicate, in writing, an understanding that the information provided will be used in fulfilling the requirements of this part and, if so, shall indicate the required disclosure or portions thereof, to which the information being furnished is applicable. Where such a statement is furnished, the expert shall not be responsible for any items of information, or portions thereof, other than those expressly set forth in this statement.

Acts 1994, ch. 828, § 4.

66-5-205. Liability for changed circumstances.

If information disclosed in accordance with this part is subsequently rendered or discovered to be inaccurate as a result of any act, occurrence, information received, circumstance or agreement subsequent to the delivery of the required disclosures, the inaccuracy resulting therefrom does not constitute a violation of this part; provided, however, that at or before closing, the owner shall be required to disclose any material change in the physical condition of the property or certify to the purchaser at closing that the condition of the property is substantially the same as it was when the disclosure form was provided. If, at the time the disclosures are required to be made, an item of information required to be disclosed is unknown or not available to the owner, the owner may state that the information is unknown or may use an approximation of the information; provided, that the approximation is clearly identified as such, is reasonable, is based on the actual knowledge of the owner and is not used for the purpose of circumventing or evading this part.

Acts 1994, ch. 828, § 5.

66-5-206. Duties of real estate licensees.

A real estate licensee representing an owner of residential real property as the listing broker has a duty to inform each such owner represented by that licensee of the owner's rights and obligations under this part. A real estate licensee representing a purchaser of residential real property or, if the purchaser is not represented by a licensee, the real estate licensee representing an owner of residential real estate and dealing with the purchaser has a duty to inform each such purchaser of the purchaser's rights and obligations under this part. If a real estate licensee performs those duties, the licensee shall have no further duties to the parties to a residential real estate transaction under this part, and shall not be liable to any party to a residential real estate transaction for a violation of this part or for any failure to disclose any information regarding any real property subject to this part. However, a cause of action for damages or equitable remedies may be brought against a real estate licensee for intentionally misrepresenting or defrauding a purchaser. A real estate licensee will further be subject to a cause of action for damages or equitable relief for failing to disclose adverse facts of which the licensee has actual knowledge or notice. “Adverse facts” means conditions or occurrences generally recognized by competent licensees that significantly reduce the structural integrity of improvements to real property, or present a significant health risk to occupants of the property.

Acts 1994, ch. 828, § 6.

66-5-207. Liability for nondisclosure of communicable diseases or criminal acts on property.

Notwithstanding any of the provisions of this part, or any other statute or regulation, no cause of action shall arise against an owner or a real estate licensee for failure to disclose that an occupant of the subject real property, whether or not such real property is subject to this part, was afflicted with human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) or other disease which has been determined by medical evidence to be highly unlikely to be transmitted through the occupancy of a dwelling place, or that the real property was the site of:

An act or occurrence which had no effect on the physical structure of the real property, its physical environment or the improvements located thereon; or

A homicide, felony or suicide.

Acts 1994, ch. 828, § 7.

66-5-208. Remedies for misrepresentation or nondisclosure.

The purchaser's remedies for an owner's misrepresentation on a residential property disclosure statement shall be either:

An action for actual damages suffered as a result of defects existing in the property as of the date of execution of the real estate purchase contract; provided, that the owner has actually presented to a purchaser the disclosure statement required by this part, and of which the purchaser was not aware at the earlier of closing or occupancy by the purchaser, in the event of a sale, or occupancy in the event of a lease with the option to purchase. Any action brought under this subsection (a) shall be commenced within one (1) year from the date the purchaser received the disclosure statement or the date of closing, or occupancy if a lease situation, whichever occurs first;

In the event of a misrepresentation in any residential property disclosure statement required by this part, termination of the contract prior to closing, subject to § 66-5-204; or

Such other remedies at law or equity otherwise available against an owner in the event of an owner's intentional or willful misrepresentation of the condition of the subject property.

No cause of action may be instituted against an owner of residential real property subject to this part for the owner's failure to provide the disclosure or disclaimer statement required by this part. However, such owner would be subject to any other cause of action available in law or equity against an owner for misrepresentation or failure to disclose material facts regarding the subject property that exists on July 1, 1994.

No cause of action may be instituted against a closing agent or closing attorney for the failure of an owner to provide the disclaimer or disclosure required by this part or for any misrepresentations made by a seller on the disclosure form supplied to the purchaser pursuant to this part.

No cause of action may be instituted against a real estate licensee for information contained in any reports or opinions prepared by an engineer, land surveyor, geologist, wood destroying inspection control expert, termite inspector, mortgage broker, home inspector, or other home inspection expert. A real estate licensee may not be the subject of any action and no action may be instituted against a real estate licensee for any information contained in the form prescribed by § 66-5-210, unless the real estate licensee is signatory to such.

Nothing in this subsection (d) shall be construed to exempt or excuse a real estate licensee from making any of the disclosures required by § 62-13-403, § 62-13-405 or § 66-5-206, nor shall it be construed to remove, limit or otherwise affect any remedy provided by law for such a failure to disclose.

The failure of an owner to provide a purchaser the disclosure or disclaimer required by this part shall not have any effect on title to property subject to this part and the presence or absence of such disclosure or disclaimer is not a cloud on title and has no effect on title to such property.

Acts 1994, ch. 828, § 8; 2003, ch. 263, § 1.

66-5-209. Exempt property transfers.

The following are specifically excluded from this part:

Transfers pursuant to court order including, but not limited to, transfers ordered by a court in the administration of an estate, transfers pursuant to a writ of execution, transfers by foreclosure sale, transfers by a trustee in bankruptcy, transfers by eminent domain and transfers resulting from a decree of specific performance;

Transfers to a beneficiary of a deed of trust by a trustor or successor in interest who is in default; transfers by a trustee under a deed of trust pursuant to a foreclosure sale; or transfers by a beneficiary under a deed of trust who has acquired the real property at a sale conducted pursuant to a foreclosure sale under a deed of trust or has acquired the real property by a deed in lieu of foreclosure;

Transfers by a fiduciary in the course of the administration of a decedent's estate, guardianship, conservatorship or trust;

Transfers from one (1) or more co-owners solely to one (1) or more co-owners. This subdivision (4) is intended to apply and only does apply in situations where ownership is by a tenancy by the entirety, a joint tenancy or a tenancy in common and the transfer will be made from one (1) or more of the owners to another owner or co-owners holding property either as a joint tenancy, tenancy in common or tenancy by the entirety;

Transfers made solely to any combination of a spouse or a person or persons in the lineal line of consanguinity of one (1) or more of the transferors;

Transfers between spouses resulting from a decree of divorce or a property settlement stipulation;

Transfers made by virtue of the record owner's failure to pay any federal, state or local taxes;

Transfers to or from any governmental entity of public or quasi-public housing authority or agency;

Transfers involving the first sale of a dwelling provided that the builder offers a written warranty;

Any property sold at public auction;

Any transfer of property where the owner has not resided on the property at any time within three (3) years prior to the date of transfer; and

Any transfer from a debtor in a chapter 7 or a chapter 13 bankruptcy to a creditor or third party by a deed in lieu of foreclosure or by a quitclaim deed.

Acts 1994, ch. 828, § 9; 2000, ch. 771, §§ 2-4.

66-5-210. Disclosure form.

Following is the form prescribed by the general assembly which is necessary to comply with this part. The form used does not have to be the one included in this section, but it is the intent of the general assembly that any such form includes all items contained in the form below with all acknowledgement provisions of such form:

Tennessee Residential Property Condition Disclosure The Tennessee Residential Property Disclosure Act states that anyone transferring title to residential real property must provide information about the condition of the property. This completed form constitutes that disclosure by the seller. This is not a warranty, or a substitute for any professional inspections or warranties that the purchasers may wish to obtain. Buyers and sellers should be aware that any sales agreement executed between the parties will supersede this form as to any obligations on the part of the seller to repair items identified below and/or the obligation of the buyer to accept such items “as is.” Instructions to the Seller: Complete this form yourself and answer each question to the best of your knowledge. If an answer is an estimate, clearly label it as such. The seller hereby authorizes any agent representing any party in this transaction to provide a copy of this statement to any person or entity in connection with any actual or anticipated sale of the subject property. Property Address City Seller's Name(s) Property Age Date Seller Acquired the Property Do You Occupy the Property? If Not Owner-Occupied, How Long Has It Been Since the Seller Occupied the Property? The property is a site-built home nonsite built-home (Check the one that applies) A. The Subject Property Includes the Items Checked Below: Range Oven Microwave Dishwasher Garbage Disposal Trash Compactor Water Softener 220 Volt Wiring Washer/Dryer Hookups Central Heating Heat Pump Central Air Conditioning Wall/Window Air Conditioning Window Screens Rain Gutters Fireplace(s) (Number ) Gas Starter for Fireplace Smoke Detector/Fire Alarm Burglar Alarm Patio/Decking/Gazebo Irrigation System Sump Pump Garage Door Opener(s) (Number of openers ) Intercom TV Antenna/Satellite Dish Pool Spa/Whirlpool Tub Hot Tub Sauna Current Termite Contract Access to Public Streets Other Other Garage: Attached Not Attached Carport Water Heater: Gas Solar Electric Water Supply: City Well Private Utility Other Waste Disposal: City Sewer Septic Tank Other Gas Supply: Utility Bottled Other Roof(s): Type Age (approx.) Other Items: To the best of your knowledge, are any of the above NOT in operating condition? YES NO If YES, then describe (attach additional sheets if necessary): B. Are You (Seller) Aware of Any Defects/Malfunctions in Any of the Following? Interior Walls YES NO UNKNOWN Ceilings YES NO UNKNOWN Floors YES NO UNKNOWN Windows YES NO UNKNOWN Doors YES NO UNKNOWN Insulation YES NO UNKNOWN Plumbing YES NO UNKNOWN Sewer/Septic YES NO UNKNOWN Electrical System YES NO UNKNOWN Exterior Walls YES NO UNKNOWN Roof YES NO UNKNOWN Basement YES NO UNKNOWN Foundation YES NO UNKNOWN Slab YES NO UNKNOWN Driveway YES NO UNKNOWN Sidewalks YES NO UNKNOWN Central heating YES NO UNKNOWN Heat pump YES NO UNKNOWN Central air conditioning YES NO UNKNOWN If any of the above is/are marked YES, please explain: C. Are You (Seller) Aware of Any of the Following? 1. Substances, materials or products which may be an environmental hazard such as, but not limited to: asbestos, radon gas, lead-based paint, fuel or chemical storage tanks and/or contaminated soil or water on the subject property? YES NO UNKNOWN 2. Features shared in common with adjoining land owners, such as walls, but not limited to, fences, and/or driveways, with joint rights and obligations for use and maintenance? YES NO UNKNOWN 3. Any authorized changes in roads, drainage or utilities affecting the property, or contiguous to the property? YES NO UNKNOWN 4. Any changes since the most recent survey of the property was done? YES NO UNKNOWN Most recent survey of the property: (check here if unknown.) 5. Any encroachments, easements, or similar items that may affect your ownership interest in the property? YES NO UNKNOWN 6. Room additions, structural modifications or other alterations or repairs made without necessary permits? YES NO UNKNOWN 7. Room additions, structural modifications or other alterations or repairs not in compliance with building codes? YES NO UNKNOWN 8. Landfill (compacted or otherwise) on the property or any portion thereof? YES NO UNKNOWN 9. Any settling from any cause, or slippage, sliding or other soil problems? YES NO UNKNOWN 10. Flooding, drainage or grading problems? YES NO UNKNOWN 11. Any requirement that flood insurance be maintained on the property? YES NO UNKNOWN 12. Property or structural damage from fire, earthquake, floods or landslides? YES NO UNKNOWN If yes, has such damage been repaired? 13. Any zoning violations, nonconforming uses and/or violations of “setback” requirements? YES NO UNKNOWN 14. Neighborhood noise problems or other nuisances? YES NO UNKNOWN 15. Subdivision and/or deed restrictions or obligations? YES NO UNKNOWN 16. A Homeowners Association (HOA) which has any authority over the subject property? YES NO UNKNOWN Name of HOA: HOA Address: Monthly Dues: Special Assessments: 17. Any “common area” (facilities such as, but not limited to, pools, tennis courts, walkways, or other areas co-owned in undivided interest with others)? YES NO UNKNOWN 18. Any notices of abatement or citations against the property? YES NO UNKNOWN 19. Any lawsuits or proposed lawsuits by or against the seller which affects or will affect the property? YES NO UNKNOWN 20. Is any system, equipment or part of the property being leased? YES NO UNKNOWN If yes, please explain, and include a written statement regarding payment information. 21. Any exterior wall covering of the structures covered with exterior insulation and finish systems (EIFS), also known as “synthetic stucco”? YES NO UNKNOWN If yes, has there been a recent inspection to determine whether the structure has excessive moisture accumulation and/or moisture related damage? (The Tennessee Real Estate Commission urges any buyer or seller who encounters this product to have a qualified professional inspect the structure in question for the preceding concern and provide a written report of the professional's finding.) YES NO UNKNOWN If yes, please explain. If necessary, please attach an additional sheet. D. Certification: I/We certify that the information herein, concerning the real property located at , is true and correct to the best of my/our knowledge as of the date signed. Should any of these conditions change prior to conveyance of title to this property, these changes will be disclosed in addendum to this document. Transferor (Buyer) Date Transferor (Buyer) Date Parties may wish to obtain professional advice and/or inspections of the property and to negotiate appropriate provisions in the purchase agreement regarding advice, inspections or defects. Transferee/Buyer's Acknowledgement: I/We understand that this disclosure statement is not intended as a substitute for any inspection, and that I/we have a responsibility to pay diligent attention to and inquire about those material defects which are evident by careful observation. I/We acknowledge receipt of a copy of this disclosure. Transferee (Buyer) Date Transferee (Buyer) Date If the property being purchased is a condominium, the transferee/buyer is hereby given notice that the transferee/buyer is entitled, upon request, to receive certain information regarding the administration of the condominium from the developer or the condominium association, as applicable, pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, §66-27-502.

Click to view form.

Acts 1994, ch. 828, § 10; 1998, ch. 727, § 1; 2000, ch. 771, § 5; 2008, ch. 766, § 2.

Law Reviews.

The Hazards of Taxing Contaminated Properties: Owners Beware! (Darlene Marsh, Byron Taylor and Andy Raines), 37 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 21 (2001).

Collateral References.

Landlord's liability for injury or death of tenant's child from lead paint poisoning. 19 A.L.R.5th 405.

66-5-211. Disclosure of impact fees or adequate facilities taxes — Definitions.

In transfers involving the first sale of a dwelling, the owner of residential property shall furnish to the purchaser a statement disclosing the amount of any impact fees or adequate facilities taxes paid to any city or county on any parcel of land subject to transfer by sale, exchange, installment land sales contract, or lease with an option to buy.

For the purpose of this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Adequate facilities tax” means any privilege tax that is a development tax, by whatever name, imposed by a county or city, pursuant to any act of general or local application, on engaging in the act of development;

“Development” means the construction, building, reconstruction, erection, extension, betterment, or improvement of land providing a building or structure, or the addition to any building or structure or any part of any building or structure that provides, adds to, or increases the floor area of a residential or nonresidential use; and

“Impact fee” means a monetary charge imposed by a county or municipal government pursuant to any act of general or local application, to regulate new development on real property. The amount of impact fees are related to the costs resulting from the new development and the revenues for this fee are earmarked for investment in the area of the new development.

Acts 2005, ch. 171, § 1.

66-5-212. Disclosure of known percolation tests or soil absorption rates — Disclosure of foundation move — Disclosure of presence of sinkhole.

In addition to any other disclosure required by this part, the seller shall, prior to entering into a contract with a buyer, disclose in the contract itself or in writing, including acknowledgement of receipt, the presence of any known exterior injection well and the results of any known percolation test or soil absorption rate performed on the property that is determined or accepted by the department of environment and conservation.

Prior to entering into a contract with a buyer on or after May 20, 2009, the seller shall, where such information is known to the seller, also disclose in the same manner whether any single family residence located on the property has been moved from an existing foundation to another foundation.

In addition to any other disclosure required by this part, the seller shall, prior to entering into a contract with a buyer, disclose in the contract or in writing, including acknowledgment of receipt, the presence of a known sinkhole on the property.

For purposes of this section, “sinkhole”:

Means a subterranean void created by the dissolution of limestone or dolostone strata resulting from groundwater erosion, causing a surface subsidence of soil, sediment, or rock; and

Is indicated through the contour lines on the property's recorded plat map.

Acts 2006, ch. 699, § 1; 2007, ch. 244, § 1; 2009, ch. 231, § 1; 2015, ch. 262, § 1.

Compiler's Notes Acts 2015, ch. 262, § 2 provided that the act, which added (c), shall apply to any contract entered into on or after July 1, 2015.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 262, § 2. July 1, 2015.

66-5-213. Disclosure requirement where property is located in a planned unit development.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Bylaws” mean guidelines for the operation of a homeowner's association that define the duties of the various offices of the board of directors, the terms of the directors, the membership's voting rights, required meetings and notices of meetings and the principal office of the association, as well as other specific items that are necessary to run the homeowner's association as a business;

“Planned unit development (PUD)” means an area of land, controlled by one (1) or more landowners, to be developed under unified control or unified plan of development for a number of dwelling units, commercial, educational, recreational or industrial uses, or any combination of these, the plan for which does not correspond in lot size, bulk or type of use, density, lot coverage, open space or other restrictions to the existing land use regulations; and

“Restrictive covenant” means any written provision that places limitations or conditions on some aspect of use of the property, such as size, location or height of structures, materials to be used in structure exterior, activities carried out on the property or restrictions on future subdivision or land development.

In addition to any other disclosures required in this part with regard to transfers described in § 66-5-201, the owner of the residential property shall, prior to entering a contract with a buyer, disclose in the contract itself or in writing, including acknowledgement, if the property is located in a PUD, and make available to the buyer a copy of the development's restrictive covenants, homeowner bylaws and master deed upon request.

Acts 2009, ch. 112, § 1.